Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 10
ABSENTEE VOTING

31-10-1001. When absent electors may vote.

Any registered elector of a municipality may cast a ballot at the election in the manner provided in sections 31-10-1001 to 31-10-1007.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1060, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 329, § 88, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1669, § 85, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1710, § 10, effective July 1.

31-10-1002. Application for absentee voter's ballot - permanent absentee voter status - ballot delivery - list of absentee voters.

Requests for an application for an absentee voter's ballot may be made orally or in writing. Applications for absentee voters' ballots shall be filed in writing and personally signed by the applicant or a family member related by blood, marriage, civil union, or adoption to the applicant. If the applicant is unable to sign the application, the applicant shall make such applicant's mark on the application, which shall be witnessed by another person. The application shall be filed with the clerk not earlier than ninety days before and not later than the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding such regular or special election. The application may be in the form of a letter.

Upon receipt of an application for an absentee voter's ballot within the proper time, the clerk receiving it shall examine the records of the county clerk and recorder to ascertain whether or not the applicant is registered and lawfully entitled to vote as requested, and, if found to be so, the clerk shall deliver, as soon as practicable, but not more than seventy-two hours after the ballots have been received, to the applicant personally in the clerk's office or by mail to the mailing address given in the application for an official absentee voter's ballot, an identification return envelope with the affidavit thereon properly filled in as to precinct and residence address as shown by the records of the county clerk and recorder, and an instruction card.

(2.3) The clerk shall keep a list of names of eligible electors who have applied for absentee ballots and, if applicable, of permanent absentee voters pursuant to subsection (2.5) of this section, with the date on which each application was made, the date on which the absentee voter's ballot was sent, and the date on which each absentee voter's ballot was returned. If an absentee voter's ballot is not returned, or if it is rejected and not counted, that fact will be noted on the list. The list is open to public inspection under proper regulations.

(2.5) (a) The clerk may permit an eligible elector to request permanent absentee voter status.

Upon receipt of an application for permanent absentee voter status, the clerk shall process the application in the same manner as an application for an absentee voter's ballot. If the clerk determines that the applicant is an eligible elector, the clerk shall place the eligible elector's name on the list maintained by the municipality pursuant to subsection (2.3) of this section of those eligible electors to whom an absentee voter's ballot is mailed every time there is a polling place election conducted by the municipality from which the eligible elector has requested permanent absentee voter status.

An eligible elector whose name appears on the list maintained pursuant to subsection (2.3) of this section as a permanent absentee voter must remain on the list and must be mailed an absentee voter's ballot for each polling place election conducted by the municipality.

An eligible elector must be deleted from the permanent absentee voter list if:

The eligible elector notifies the clerk that he or she no longer wishes to vote by absentee voter's ballot; or

The absentee voter's ballot sent to the eligible elector is returned to the clerk as undeliverable; or

The person is no longer eligible to vote in the political subdivision.

Before any absentee voter's ballot is delivered or mailed or before any registered elector is permitted to cast his or her vote on a voting machine, the clerk shall record such elector's name, the precinct number, and the number appearing on the stub of the ballot, together with the date the ballot is delivered or mailed. This information must be recorded on the registration record or registration list before the registration book or list is delivered to the judges of election. A separate list of the registered electors who have received absentee voters' ballots must be delivered to the judges of election in the precinct designated for counting absentee voters' ballots, or, if the clerk elects to deliver absentee voters' envelopes received from electors of each precinct to the judges of election of such precinct, as provided by section 31-10-1006, a separate list of the registered electors of each precinct who have received absentee voters' ballots must be delivered to the judges of election of each such precinct.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 640, 87, effective May 1, 1991.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1061, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 233, § 7, effective June 19.

L. 79:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1179, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 329, § 89, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 640, § 87, effective May 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1670, § 86, effective July 1; (1) and (2) amended, p. 1710, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 797, § 18, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

(2.5) added, (HB 09-1216), ch. 165, p. 730, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 65, § 21, effective February 18.

31-10-1003. Self-affirmation on return envelope.

The return envelope shall have printed on its face a self-affirmation substantially in the following form:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 641, § 88, effective May 1, 1991.)

"State of .... Municipality of ...., County of ....
I, ...., affirm and say that I am a qualified and registered elector in the municipality of .... and state of Colorado; that my residence and post-office address is ....; and that I herein enclose my ballot in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". I realize that if any false statements are contained herein that I shall be subject to prosecution for criminal action.
............................................................
Signature of voter"

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1061, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 330, § 90, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 641, § 88, effective May 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 67, § 22, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-803 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-1004. Manner of absentee voting by paper ballot.

Any registered elector applying for and receiving an absent voter's ballot, in casting the ballot, shall make and subscribe to the self-affirmation on the return identification envelope. The voter shall then mark the ballot. The voter shall fold the ballot so as to conceal the marking, deposit it in the return envelope, and seal the envelope securely. The envelope may be delivered personally or mailed by the voter to the clerk issuing the ballot. It is permissible for a voter to deliver the ballot to any person of the voter's own choice or to any duly authorized agent of the clerk for mailing or personal delivery to the clerk. All envelopes containing absent voters' ballots shall be in the hands of the clerk not later than the hour of 7 p.m. on the day of election.

(1.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 641, § 89, effective May 1, 1991.)

Upon receipt of an absent voter's ballot, the clerk shall write or stamp upon the envelope containing the same the date and hour such envelope was received in his office and, if the ballot was delivered in person, the name and address of the person delivering the same. He shall safely keep and preserve all absent voters' ballots unopened until the time prescribed for delivery to the judges, as provided in section 31-10-1006.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1062, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1180, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 330, § 91, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 641, § 89, effective May 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1711, § 12, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-804 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1005. Absent voters' voting machines - electronic voting systems.

Any municipality using voting machines may provide one or more voting machines in the clerk's office for the use of qualified applicants for absent voters' ballots. If such machines are provided, they shall be available from twelve days prior to the election until the closing of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election. Votes on such machines shall be cast and counted in the same manner as votes would be cast and counted on a voting machine in a precinct polling place on election day. The clerk shall supervise the casting and counting of absent voters' ballots on the machines. The machines shall remain locked and the tabulation of the votes cast shall remain unknown until the day of the election.

Any municipality using an electronic voting system may provide such system for the use of qualified applicants for absent voters' ballots. Such system shall be available from twelve days prior to the election until the closing day of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election. Votes cast using such system shall be cast in the same manner as votes would be cast in a precinct polling place on election day. The clerk shall supervise the casting and counting of absent voters' ballots using such system.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1062, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-805 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1006. Delivery to judges.

Not later than 8:30 a.m. on the day of any municipal election, the clerk shall deliver to the judges of one of the precincts of the municipality, which precinct shall be selected by the clerk, all the absent voters' envelopes received up to that time, in sealed packages, taking a receipt for the packages, together with the list of absent voters, or, in the clerk's discretion, the clerk may elect to deliver the absent voters' envelopes received from electors of each precinct and the list of absent voters for each precinct to the judges of the precinct. The clerk shall continue to deliver any envelopes which may be received thereafter during said day up to and including 7 p.m. On the sealed packages shall be printed or written, "This package contains ....(number) absent voters' ballots." With the envelopes the clerk shall deliver to one of the election judges written instructions, which shall be followed by the judges of election in casting and counting the ballots, and all the books, records, and supplies as are needed for tabulating, recording, and certifying said absent voters' ballots.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1062, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1180, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1711, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-806 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1007. Casting and counting absentee ballots.

If the self-affirmation on the envelope containing the absentee voter's ballot is properly sworn to, one of the judges shall open such voter's identification envelope in the presence of a majority of the judges, and, after announcing in an audible voice the name of such absentee voter, he or she shall tear open such envelope without defacing the self-affirmation printed thereon or mutilating the enclosed ballot. Such ballot must then be cast and counted in the same manner as if such absentee voter had been present in person; except that one of the judges shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box without unfolding it. If the absentee voters' ballots are delivered to the judges of one precinct selected by the clerk as provided by section 31-10-1006, the absentee vote must be certified separately from the vote of the precinct where it is counted.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 642, § 90, effective May 1, 1991.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1063, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1180, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 331, § 92, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 642, § 90, effective May 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 67, § 23, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-807 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-1008. Challenge of absentee ballots - rejection - record.

The vote of any absentee voter may be challenged in the same manner as other votes are challenged, and the judges of election shall have power to determine the legality of such ballot. If the challenge is sustained or if the judges determine that the self-affirmation accompanying the absentee voter's ballot is insufficient or that the voter is not a registered elector, the envelope containing the ballot of such voter shall not be opened, and the judges shall endorse on the back of the envelope the reason therefor. When it is made to appear to the judges of election by sufficient proof that any absentee voter who has marked and forwarded his or her ballot has died, the envelope containing the ballot of such deceased voter shall not be opened, and the judges shall make proper notation on the back of such envelope. If an absentee voter's envelope contains more than one marked ballot of any one kind, none of such ballots shall be counted, and the judges shall make notation on the back of the ballots the reason therefor. Judges of election shall certify in their returns the number of absentee voters' ballots cast and counted and the number of such ballots rejected.

All absentee voters' identification envelopes, ballot stubs, and absentee voters' ballots rejected by the judges of election in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be returned to the clerk. All absentee voters' ballots received by the clerk after 7 p.m. the day of the election, together with those rejected and returned by the judges of election, as provided in this section, shall remain in the sealed identification envelopes and be destroyed later, as provided in section 31-10-616.

If an absentee voter's ballot is not returned or if it is rejected and not counted, such fact shall be noted on the record kept by the clerk. Such record shall be open to public inspection under proper regulations.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1063, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 642, § 91, effective May 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1711, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 68, § 24, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-808 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-1009. Oaths for absentee ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1063, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 331, § 93, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 642, § 92, effective May 1.

Editor's note:

Before its repeal, this section was similar to former § 31-10-809 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1010. Emergency absentee voting - definition.

If the voter is confined in a hospital or his or her place of residence on election day because of conditions arising after the closing day for absent voters' ballot applications, the voter may request in a written statement, signed by him or her, that the clerk send him or her an absent voter's ballot with the word "EMERGENCY" stamped on the stubs thereof. The clerk shall deliver the emergency absent voter's ballot at his or her office, during the regular hours of business, to any authorized representative of the voter possessing a written statement from the voter's physician, physician assistant authorized under section 12-240-107 (6), advanced practice registered nurse, or practitioner that the voter will be confined in a hospital or his or her place of residence on election day. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(a), "authorized representative" means a person possessing a written statement from the voter containing the voter's signature, name, and address and requesting that the emergency absent voter's ballot be given to the authorized person as identified by name and address. The authorized person shall acknowledge receipt of the emergency ballot with his or her signature, name, and address.

A request for an emergency absent voter's ballot under this section shall be made before, and the ballot shall be returned to the clerk's office no later than, 7 p.m. on election day.

Any voter unable to go to the polls because of conditions arising after the closing day for absent voters' ballot applications which will result in his absence from the precinct on election day may apply at the office of the clerk for an emergency absent voter's ballot. Upon receipt of an affidavit signed by the voter on a form provided by the clerk and attesting to the fact that the voter will be compelled to be absent from his precinct on election day because of conditions arising after the closing day for absent voters' ballot applications, the clerk shall provide the voter with an absent voter's ballot, with the word "EMERGENCY" stamped on the stubs thereof.

After marking his ballot, the voter shall place it in a return envelope provided by the clerk. He shall then fill out and sign the self-affirmation on the envelope, as provided in section 31-10-1003, on or before election day and return it to the office of the clerk. Upon receipt of the envelope, the clerk shall verify the voter's name on the return envelope with that which appears on his office precinct record and, if they compare, shall deliver the envelope to the election judges, as provided in section 31-10-1006.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1181, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 1506, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 643, § 93, effective May 1.

L. 93:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1712, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 135, § 28, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 16-158), ch. 204, p. 729, § 23, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1719, § 217, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-158, see section 1 of chapter 204, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.